North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 11. Medicaid Eligibility Determinations Accuracy and Quality Assurance.

§ 108A-70.45.
Applicability.

If a federally recognized Native American tribe within the State has assumed responsibility for the Medicaid program pursuant to

G.S. 108A-25(e)

, then this Part applies to the tribe in the same manner as it applies to county departments of social services.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c).

§ 108A-70.46.
Audit of county Medicaid determinations.

Beginning January 1, 2019, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support, shall audit county departments of social services for compliance with the accuracy standards adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.47

for Medicaid eligibility determinations made within a 12-month period. This audit shall also include an evaluation of compliance with the quality assurance standards under

G.S. 108A-70.48

by the county department of social services. Audits shall be conducted for initial Medicaid eligibility determination applications as well as Medicaid reenrollment determinations. The Department shall ensure that every county is audited no less than once every three years.

Beginning 18 months after the Department has implemented the training and certification program under

G.S. 108A-26.5

, the Department shall include in its audits required under this section a verification that all county departments of social services are in compliance with the certification program requirements for individuals involved in the Medicaid eligibility determination process.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c), (h); 2018-5, s. 11H.5(a), (d).

§ 108A-70.47.
Medicaid eligibility determination processing accuracy standards.

The Department shall require county departments of social services to comply with accuracy standards set forth in rule for the processing of Medicaid eligibility determinations. The Department shall set the following standards:

Accuracy standards with regards to errors that caused an ineligible Medicaid recipient to be approved for Medicaid benefits.

Accuracy standards with regards to errors that caused the denial of benefits to an applicant that should have been approved for Medicaid benefits.

Accuracy standards with regards to errors made during the eligibility determination process that did not change the outcome of the eligibility determination.

Standards under this section shall be developed by the Department in consultation with the State Auditor.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c).

§ 108A-70.48.
Quality assurance.

The Department shall require county departments of social services to comply with quality assurance minimum standards set forth in rule. The quality assurance standards shall be based upon best practices and shall be developed by the Department in consultation with the State Auditor.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c).

§ 108A-70.49.
Corrective action.

If the Department’s audit under

G.S. 108A-70.46

results in a determination that a county department of social services fails to meet any of the standards adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.47

or

G.S. 108A-70.48

, the Department and the county department of social services shall enter into a joint corrective action plan to improve the accurate processing of applications.

A joint corrective action plan entered into pursuant to this section shall specifically identify the following components:

The duration of the joint corrective action plan, not to exceed 24 months. If a county department of social services shows measurable progress in meeting the performance requirements in the joint corrective action plan, then the duration of the joint corrective action plan may be extended by six months, but in no case shall a joint corrective action plan exceed 36 months.

A plan for improving the accurate processing of applications that specifically describes the actions to be taken by the county department of social services and the Department.

The performance requirements for the county department of social services that constitute successful completion of the joint corrective action plan.

Acknowledgment that failure to successfully complete the joint corrective action plan will result in temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration by the Department, in accordance with

G.S. 108A-70.50

.

Any county department of social services under a joint corrective action plan shall be audited under

G.S. 108A-70.46

on an annual basis until the joint corrective action plan is successfully completed or until the failure to successfully complete the joint corrective action plan results in the temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration by the Department, in accordance with

G.S. 108A-70.50

.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c); 2018-5, s. 11H.5(b).

§ 108A-70.50.
Temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration.

If a county department of social services fails to successfully complete its joint corrective action plan, the Department shall give the county department of social services, the county manager, and the board of social services or the consolidated human services board, created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77(b)

, at least 90 days’ notice that the Department intends to temporarily assume Medicaid eligibility administration, in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. The notice shall include the following information:

The date on which the Department intends to temporarily assume administration of Medicaid eligibility determinations.

The performance requirements in the joint corrective action plan that the county department of social services failed to meet.

Notice of the county department of social services’ right to appeal the decision to the Office of Administrative Hearings, pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a county department of social services fails to successfully complete its joint corrective action plan, the Department shall temporarily assume Medicaid eligibility administration for the county upon giving notice as required by subsection (a) of this section. During a period of temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration, the following shall occur:

The Department shall administer the Medicaid eligibility function in the county. Administration by the Department may include direct operation by the Department, including supervision of county Medicaid eligibility workers or contracts for operation to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.

The county department of social services is divested of the authority to administer Medicaid eligibility determinations.

The Department shall direct and oversee the expenditure of all funding for the administration of Medicaid eligibility in the county.

The county shall continue to pay the nonfederal share of the cost of Medicaid eligibility administration and shall not withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated for Medicaid eligibility administration.

The county shall pay the nonfederal share of additional costs incurred to ensure compliance with the accuracy and quality assurance standards required by this Part.

The Department shall work with the county department of social services to develop a plan for the county department of social services to resume Medicaid eligibility administration and perform Medicaid eligibility determinations more accurately.

The Department shall inform the county board of commissioners, the county manager, the county director of social services, and the board of social services or the consolidated human services board, created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77(b)

, of key activities and any ongoing concerns during the temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration.

Upon the Department’s determination that Medicaid eligibility determinations can be performed accurately and with proper quality assurance by the county department of social services based on the standards adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.47

and

G.S. 108A-70.48

, the Department shall notify the county department of social services, the county manager, and the board of social services or the consolidated human services board, created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77(b)

, that temporary assumption of Medicaid eligibility administration will be terminated and the effective date of termination. Upon termination, the county department of social services resumes its full authority to administer Medicaid eligibility determinations.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c).

§ 108A-70.51.
Reporting.

Beginning with the calendar year 2020, no later than March 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, the Fiscal Research Division, and the State Auditor that contains the following information about the prior calendar year:

The percentage of audited county departments of social services that met the accuracy standards adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.47

in the prior fiscal year.

The percentage of audited county departments of social services that met the quality assurance standards adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.48

in the prior fiscal year.

The audit result for each standard adopted under

G.S. 108A-70.47

for each county of department services in the prior fiscal year.

The number of years in the preceding 10-year period that any county department of social services failed to meet the standards in

G.S. 108A-70.47

or

G.S. 108A-70.48

.

A description of all corrective action activities conducted by the Department and county departments of social services in accordance with

G.S. 108A-70.49

.

For every county in which the performance metrics for processing Medicaid applications in an accurate manner do not show significant improvement compared to the previous audit of that county, a description of how the Department plans to assist county departments of social services in accuracy and quality assurance standards for Medicaid applications.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.22(c); 2018-5, s. 11H.5(c).